Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-3115
Teacher shortage area; Excellence in Teaching Act; rules and regulations.

The State Board of Education may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to determine teacher shortage areas. The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Excellence in Teaching Act.

Laws 2000, LB 1399, § 23;

Laws 2009, LB547, § 15;

R.S.1943, (2014), § 79-8,140;

Laws 2023, LB705, § 27.